Vermont statutes. Title 1 General Provisions
Chapter 15. New Hampshire-Vermont Boundary

The acts from which this chapter is derived became effective May 22, 1935, upon passage of similar legislation by the state of New Hampshire.

§ 611.
Perambulation, renewal.

The boundary line between the State of New Hampshire and the State of Vermont shall be perambulated and markers and bounds renewed wherever necessary once in every seven years forever by the Attorney General of this State in conjunction with the Attorney General of the State of New Hampshire or by such person as the Attorney General shall in writing appoint for that purpose.

§ 612.
Return.

A return of the perambulation shall be made, particularly describing the marks and monuments of such line and their location, which shall be signed by the Attorney General or the person making the same and recorded with the Secretary of State.

§ 613.
Notice.

The Attorney General of this State shall give notice to the Attorney General of New Hampshire of the time and place of the meeting for such perambulation 30 days before the day of the meeting.

§ 614.
Expenses of perambulation.

All expenses incurred by representation of this State incidental to such perambulation shall be paid by the State, including one-half of the cost of renewing markers or monuments. The Commissioner of Finance and Management is hereby authorized to draw his or her warrant therefor out of any money in the Treasury not otherwise appropriated.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 328

(Adj. Sess.), § 8(c);

1983, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 5(b).

§ 615.
Monuments; notice of construction affecting.

No person, firm, or corporation shall begin or attempt to begin any alteration or improvement of the banks or bed of the Connecticut River, the erection of any building, dam, or other structure upon the banks or bed of such river or any other operations which will affect the waters or flow of such river so as to make the ascertaining of the location of the boundary line between the State of New Hampshire and the State of Vermont difficult without first giving notice thereof to the Attorney General of this State and the Attorney General of New Hampshire.

§ 616.
Inspection.

Upon receipt of such notice, the Attorney General of this State shall communicate with the Attorney General of New Hampshire concerning the subject matter thereof, shall arrange for a joint inspection by such Attorneys General or their representatives of the premises described therein to determine the need of the erection of monuments to permanently mark the location of the boundary line in the area to be affected.
If required, such Attorneys General or their representatives shall erect such markers as are necessary.

§ 617.
Permit.

Upon determination of need for or lack of need for a marking of the boundary, the Attorney General of this State shall certify the determination made to the person, firm, or corporation giving notice, and issue a permit that the work upon such alteration, improvement, building, dam, structure, or operation affecting the waters or flow of such river may be begun upon a day certain.
Such date shall be fixed as will give a reasonable time for the erection of monuments for the marking of the boundary if a need for such monuments has been determined; otherwise, so as to inconvenience the giver of the notice as little as possible.

§ 618.
Penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation who shall have failed to give the notice described in section 615 of this title or who, without having received from the Attorney General of this State the certificate and permit described in section 617, shall begin or attempt to begin any alteration or improvement of the banks or bed of the Connecticut River, the erection of any building, dam, or other structure upon the banks or bed of such river or any other operation which will affect the waters or flow of such river shall be fined not more than $5,000.00.